District of Columbia statutes.
11-2609

Repealed

Authority of Council.

Repealed.

Sept. 3, 1974, 88 Stat. 1093, Pub. L. 93-412, § 2
Aug. 5, 1997, 111 Stat. 760, Pub. L. 105-33, § 11262(c)(1)
Joint contracts, action for breach, compulsory joinder of representatives of deceased defendant, see § 16-2104.
1981 Ed., § 11-2609.
1973 Ed., § 11-2609.
Pub. L. 105-33, title XI, § 11721, Aug. 5, 1997, 111 Stat. 786, provided: “Sec. 11721. Effective Date. Except as otherwise provided in this title, the provisions of this title shall take effect on the later of October 1, 1997, or the day the District of Columbia Financial Responsibility and Management Assistance Authority certifies that the financial plan and budget for the District government for fiscal year 1998 meet the requirements of section 201(c)(1) of the District of Columbia Financial Responsibility and Management Assistance Act of 1995, as amended by this title.”
Prior to repeal by Pub. L. 105-33, this section read: “Section 602 (a) (4) of the District of Columbia Self-Government and Governmental Reorganization Act shall not apply to this chapter.”